Utah statutes.
4-9-10.   Packaged commodity sales -- Labeling information specified -- When price per single unit of weight to be displayed.

(1) Any packaged commodity offered for sale shall bear on the outside of the package a definite, plain, and conspicuous declaration of:

(a)  the identity of the commodity in the package, unless the same can easily be identified through the wrapper or container;

(b)  the quantity of contents in terms of weight, measure, or count; and

(c)  the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor, if the packaged commodity is offered for sale, or sold other than on the premises where packaged.

(2)  Any package which is one of a lot containing random weights of the same commodity and bearing the total sales price of the package shall, in addition to compliance with Subsection (1) of this section, bear on the outside of the package a definite, plain, and conspicuous declaration of the price per single unit of weight.

